Massachusetts, session 194th, H3611.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 13D the following section:-
13D1/2. High schools shall annually provide a seminar on the dangers of texting and
driving. All students shall be required to attend the seminar.
SECTION 2. The second paragraph of section 8 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is
hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
(f) submitted a letter of good standing for the applicant by his or her principal or
designated school official.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 8M of said chapter 90 is hereby amended by striking out the
second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
A junior operator who violates the preceding paragraph shall be punished by a fine of
$100 and shall have his or her license or permit suspended for up to 180 days for a first offense
and shall not be eligible for license reinstatement until he or she also completes a program
selected by the registrar that encourages attitudinal changes in young drivers; for a second
offense by a fine of $250 and shall have his or her license or permit suspended for up to 1 year;
and for a third or subsequent offense by a fine of $500 and shall have his or her license or permit
suspended for 1 year.
SECTION 4. Section 17 of said chapter 90 is hereby amended by adding the following
paragraph:
A junior operator who violates this section may be subject to a 180-day license
suspension and a minimum fine of $100 for their first offense.
of 2